New York, session 2025-2026, S1956.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The legislative law is amended by adding a new section 52-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 52-a. Requirements with respect to bills mandating expenditures or 4 appropriations. A bill that enacts or amends any expenditures or appro- 5 priations shall state the estimated cost of such expenditure or appro- 6 priation in the body of the bill. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 8 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02800-01-5